Washington statutes.
RCW 36.47.070

Merger of state association of county officials with state association of counties.

It is the desire of the legislature that the Washington State Association of County Officials, as set forth in chapter 36.47 RCW and the Washington State Association of Counties, as set forth in RCW 36.32.350, shall merge into one association of elected county officers. Only one association shall carry out the duties imposed by RCW 36.32.335 through 36.32.360 and 36.47.020 through 36.47.060.

[ 1998 c 245 s 29; 1977 ex.s. c 221 s 2.]